sv: Elektroniska funktioner: Sedelskanning; Miniräknare; Dra/blippa kort; Mynträkning; Bildskärm; Belysning; Ljud; Röstuppmaningar; Övrigt
de: Elektronische Funktionen: Geldschein-Scan; Rechner; Karte durchziehen/antippen; Münzzählung; Display; Lichter; Geräusche; Sprachansagen; Sonstige
zh-CN: 电子功能: 纸币扫描; 计算器; 刷卡/轻触; 硬币清点; 显示屏; 灯光; 声音; 语音提示; 其他
da: Elektroniske funktioner: Scanning af sedler; Lommeregner; Kortstrygning/-tryk; Mønttælling; Skærm; Lys; Lyde; Stemmemeddelelser; Andet
ro-RO: Caracteristici electronice: Scanare bancnote; Calculator; Trecere/atingere card; Numărare monede; Ecran de afișare; Lumini; Sunete; Mesaje vocale; Altele
el: Ηλεκτρονικές λειτουργίες: Σάρωση χαρτονομισμάτων; Αριθμομηχανή; Σάρωση/επαφή κάρτας; Καταμέτρηση νομισμάτων; Οθόνη ενδείξεων; Φώτα; Ήχοι; Φωνητικές προτροπές; Άλλο
nl: Elektronische functies: Biljetten scannen; Rekenmachine; Kaart swipen/tikken; Munten tellen; Beeldscherm; Verlichting; Geluiden; Spraakprompts; Overige
sk-SK: Elektronické funkcie: Skenovanie bankoviek; Kalkulačka; Potiahnutie/ťuknutie kartou; Počítanie mincí; Displej; Svetlá; Zvuky; Hlasové výzvy; Iné
pt-BR: Características eletrônicas: Leitura de notas; Calculadora; Passar/tocar cartão; Contagem de moedas; Tela de exibição; Luzes; Sons; Comandos de voz; Outro
lt-LT: Elektroninės funkcijos: Kupiūrų skenavimas; Skaičiuotuvas; Kortelės perbraukimas / prilietimas; Monetų skaičiavimas; Ekranas; Šviesos; Garsai; Garsinės instrukcijos; Kita
es: Características electrónicas: Escaneo de billetes; Calculadora; Deslizar/tocar tarjeta; Conteo de monedas; Pantalla de visualización; Luces; Sonidos; Indicaciones de voz; Otro
hu: Elektronikus jellemzők: Bankjegyolvasás; Számológép; Kártyalehúzás/érintés; Érmeszámlálás; Kijelző; Fények; Hangok; Hangjelzések; Egyéb
vi: Tính năng điện tử: Quét tiền giấy; Máy tính; Quẹt/chạm thẻ; Đếm tiền xu; Màn hình hiển thị; Đèn; Âm thanh; Lời nhắc bằng giọng nói; Khác
ko: 전자 기능: 지폐 스캔; 계산기; 카드 스와이프/탭; 동전 계산; 디스플레이 화면; 조명; 사운드; 음성 프롬프트; 기타
fi: Elektroniset ominaisuudet: Setelien skannaus; Laskin; Kortin pyyhkäisy / napautus; Kolikoiden laskenta; Näyttö; Valot; Äänet; Äänikehotteet; Muu
en: Electronic features: Bill scanning; Calculator; Card swipe/tap; Coin counting; Display screen; Lights; Sounds; Voice prompts; Other
cs: Elektronické funkce: Skenování bankovek; Kalkulačka; Protažení/klepnutí karty; Počítání mincí; Obrazovka; Světla; Zvuky; Hlasové pokyny; Jiné
bg-BG: Електронни функции: Сканиране на банкноти; Калкулатор; Плъзгане/доближаване на карта; Броене на монети; Екран на дисплея; Светлини; Звуци; Гласови подкани; Други
ja: 電子機能: 紙幣スキャン; 電卓; カードスワイプ/タップ; 硬貨計算; 画面表示; ライト; サウンド; 音声プロンプト; その他
tr: Elektronik özellikler: Banknot tarama; Hesap makinesi; Kart kaydırma/dokunma; Bozuk para sayma; Görüntü ekranı; Işıklar; Sesler; Sesli istemler; Diğer
pt-PT: Características eletrónicas: Leitura de notas; Calculadora; Passar/tocar com o cartão; Contagem de moedas; Ecrã de visualização; Luzes; Sons; Indicações por voz; Outro
nb: Elektroniske funksjoner: Seddelskanning; Kalkulator; Kortsveip/-trykk; Mynttelling; Skjerm; Lys; Lyder; Stemmeveiledning; Annet
it: Caratteristiche elettroniche: Scansione banconote; Calcolatrice; Strisciamento/tap della carta; Conteggio monete; Schermo display; Luci; Suoni; Istruzioni vocali; Altro
hr-HR: Elektroničke značajke: Skeniranje novčanica; Kalkulator; Provlačenje / dodirivanje karticom; Brojanje kovanica; Zaslon; Svjetla; Zvukovi; Glasovne upute; Ostalo
zh-TW: 電子功能: 鈔票掃描; 計算機; 刷卡/感應; 硬幣計數; 顯示螢幕; 燈光; 聲音; 語音提示; 其他
sl-SI: Elektronske funkcije: Optično branje bankovcev; Kalkulator; Poteg/dotik s kartico; Štetje kovancev; Zaslon; Luči; Zvoki; Glasovni pozivi; Drugo
th: คุณลักษณะทางอิเล็กทรอนิกส์: การสแกนธนบัตร; เครื่องคิดเลข; รูด/แตะบัตร; การนับเหรียญ; หน้าจอแสดงผล; แสงไฟ; เสียง; เสียงแนะนำ; อื่นๆ
pl: Funkcje elektroniczne: Skanowanie banknotów; Kalkulator; Przeciągnięcie/zbliżenie karty; Liczenie monet; Ekran wyświetlacza; Światła; Dźwięki; Komunikaty głosowe; Inne
fr: Fonctions électroniques: Numérisation de billets; Calculatrice; Glissement/pression de carte; Comptage de pièces; Écran d’affichage; Lumières; Sons; Invites vocales; Autre
ru: Электронные функции: Сканирование банкнот; Калькулятор; Проведение картой/касание; Подсчет монет; Экран дисплея; Световые эффекты; Звуковые эффекты; Голосовые подсказки; Другое